Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 4 Transportation of Passengers

Cross references.

Sale of distilled spirits, wine, and malt beverages by railway passenger carriers, §§

3-9-1

,

3-9-2

.

Programs for transportation of public school students, §§

20-2-187

,

20-2-1070

et seq.

Equal access to public accommodations and facilities by blind and deaf persons, Ch. 4, T. 30.